Alaska, session 34, SB265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 28.35.060(b) is amended to read: 04 (b) Except as provided in (c) or (d) of this section, a person who fails to 05 comply with any of the requirements of this section is, upon conviction, punishable by 06 imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than $500, or by 07 both. This provision does not apply to a person incapacitated by the accident to the 08 extent that the person is physically incapable of complying with the requirement. 09 * Sec. 2. AS 28.35.060(c) is amended to read: 10 (c) A person who fails to comply with a requirement of this section regarding 11 assisting an injured person is, upon conviction, guilty of a class B felony, punishable 12 as provided in AS 12.55 [BY IMPRISONMENT FOR NOT MORE THAN 10 13 YEARS, OR BY A FINE OF NOT MORE THAN $10,000, OR BY BOTH]. This 14 provision does not apply to a person incapacitated by the accident to the extent that the 15 person is physically incapable of complying with the requirement. 01 * Sec. 3. AS 28.35.060 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 02 (d) A person who fails to comply with a requirement of this section regarding 03 failure to render reasonable assistance is, upon conviction, guilty of a class A felony 04 punishable as provided in AS 12.55 and for a first felony conviction shall be sentenced 05 to a presumptive term of imprisonment of seven to 11 years, if the person caused the 06 death of another person while operating a motor vehicle and is convicted of criminally 07 negligent homicide under AS 11.41.130 or of criminally negligent homicide of an 08 unborn child under AS 11.41.170. 09 * Sec. 4. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 10 read: 11 APPLICABILITY. AS 28.35.060(b), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, 12 AS 28.35.060(c), as amended by sec. 2 of this Act, and AS 28.35.060(d), enacted by sec. 3 of 13 this Act, apply to offenses committed on or after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.